Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.110

Enforcement—Civil proceedings.

Civil proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought by the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of any county where a violation occurs on his or her own motion or at the request of the state director of fire protection.

[ 1992 c 116 s 4.]